Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-434
Entry permits required; purpose.

For the purpose of supplying additional revenue to better accommodate the increasing public use of the Nebraska state park system by providing improved operation and maintenance, the commission shall establish an entry permit program for areas of the Nebraska state park system which are designated as permit areas by the commission.

Laws 1977, LB 81, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1101;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 144;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 32.

Fees charged by sections 37-1101 et seq. are not violative of equal protection. State v. Sprague, 213 Neb. 581, 330 N.W.2d 739 (1983).